Tennessee, session 114, SB2354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-4-416, is amended by deleting
"forty-eight (48) hours" and substituting "twenty-four (24) hours".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2354
012071
- 1 -